Vermont, session 2025-2026, H10.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the City
of Barre as set forth in this act. The voters of the City approved the
amendments on May 14, 2024.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 1 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 1. CITY OF BARRE
* * *
§ 110. FISCAL YEAR
The fiscal year of the City and the City School District shall begin on the
first day of July and end on the last day of June of each calendar year. The
fiscal year shall constitute the budget and accounting year as used in this
charter.
§ 111. BONDING OF CITY OFFICIALS
The Mayor, councilors, members of the Police Department, City Manager,
Finance Director, Superintendent of Public Works, Tax Collector, and Clerk,
and Treasurer shall annually be bonded by the City for the faithful discharge of
their respective duties, as provided by State statute, and the expense of said
bonds to be paid by the City.
* * *
VT LEG #383331 v.1

No. M-1 Page 2 of 6
2025
§ 202. TIME OF ELECTIONS AND MEETINGS
(a) The annual City meeting of the City for the election of officers, the
voting of budgets, and any other business included in the warnings for the
meeting, shall be held on the first second Tuesday in March May, unless
otherwise legally warned by the Council.
* * *
§ 203. SPECIAL CITY AND SCHOOL DISTRICT MEETINGS
Special City meetings and Special School District meetings shall be called
in the manner provided by the laws of the State, and the voting on all questions
shall be by the Australian ballot system, except for budget votes as provided in
section 207(d).
* * *
§ 205. OFFICERS ELECTED
(a)(1) The legal voters shall elect biennially a Mayor and one person to
serve as a Clerk and Treasurer.
* * *
(3) Annually, the legal voters shall elect school commissioners to serve
for a term of three years, as follows:
(A) at the 2019 annual City meeting, and each successive three-year
cycle after that, three school commissioners;
(B) at the 2020 annual City meeting, and each successive three-year
cycle after that, two school commissioners;
VT LEG #383331 v.1

No. M-1 Page 3 of 6
2025
(C) at the 2021 annual City meeting, and each successive three-year
cycle after that, two school commissioners. [Repealed.]
(b) The legal voters shall elect annually Spaulding Union High School
District School Board members in the manner, number, and term limit as is
specified in the Barre City/Barre Town Union High School Agreement, dated
November 30, 1986, or any such successor document. [Repealed.]
§ 206. VACANCIES
(a) In case of vacancy of any elected municipal City officer, except a
councilor or school commissioner, occasioned by death, removal from the
City, resignation, or inability to serve, such vacancy, unless herein otherwise
provided, shall be filled by appointment by the City Council until the next
annual election. In such case, nomination may be made by any member for the
Council.
* * *
(c) In case of a vacancy of any school commissioner, occasioned by death,
removal from the City, resignation, or inability to serve, such vacancy, unless
herein otherwise provided, shall be filled by appointment by the remaining
members of the School Board until the next annual election. In such case,
nomination may be made by any member of the School Board. [Repealed.]
§ 207. VOTING ON REQUEST OF THE CITY MANAGER
(a) Annually, on the first second Tuesday in March May, the legal voters of
the City shall meet to vote on the requests of the City Manager.
VT LEG #383331 v.1

No. M-1 Page 4 of 6
2025
(b) If, at the annual March meeting, the voters disapprove the request of the
City Manager, the Mayor, or in his or her absence or disability, the City Clerk,
shall warn a general meeting of the legal voters to consider the article
disapproved by the voters and to authorize a specific sum of money therefor.
The meeting shall be in accordance with 17 V.S.A. §§ 2630–2689 and shall be
held at the same location as the previous meeting with the polls open for the
same hours as the previous meeting. If the voters continue to disapprove any
portion of the request, similar meetings shall be held in the same manner.
* * *
§ 301. GOVERNING BODY
The City shall be governed by an elected Council and by an appointed City
Manager and by such other officers and employees as may be duly appointed
pursuant to this charter, City ordinances, or general laws of the State of
Vermont.
* * *
(2) Within the limitations of the foregoing, the Council shall have the
power to:
* * *
(B) appoint and remove a Treasurer, and such Assistant Treasurers as
shall be deemed necessary, who shall be responsible for the performance of all
duties of a municipal treasurer under State law;
VT LEG #383331 v.1

No. M-1 Page 5 of 6
2025
(C) assign additional duties to offices, commissions, or departments
established by this charter, but may not discontinue or assign to any other
office, commission, or department duties assigned to a particular office,
commission, or department established by this charter;
(C)(D) make, amend, and repeal ordinances; and
(D)(E) adopt an official seal of the City.
* * *
§ 315. COMPENSATION OF CITY OFFICIALS
Compensation of Mayor, councilors, and other appointees and City officers:
* * *
(3) When the legal voters have authorized an annual City and school
budget, the City Council, School Board, and/or or the City Manager shall not
authorize appropriations, expenditures, or payment in excess of the amount
voted. Deficit spending shall be prohibited by the City of Barre and the City of
Barre Schools.
* * *
Sec. 3. REPEALS
24 App. V.S.A. chapter 1, §§ 413 (School District), 516 (powers and duties
of Board of School Commissioners), and 517 (appointment of superintendent
and principal) are repealed.
VT LEG #383331 v.1

No. M-1 Page 6 of 6
2025
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 1, 2025
VT LEG #383331 v.1